District of Columbia statutes.
42-2624

Assistance.

(a)

Assistance available pursuant to this subchapter is limited to a one-time loan of up to $15,000 with a maximum 20-year amortized term.

(b)

The interest rate shall be 3%, unless otherwise provided by the Mayor by rulemaking.

(c)

The Mayor shall establish underwriting guidelines, including loan amounts and repayment terms, by rulemaking.

History

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-266, § 5, 46 DCR 948
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 155, 47 DCR 520

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2214.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91 validated a previously made technical amendment in subsec. (a).